Arkansas, session 2025, HB1309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-79-140(c), concerning mammographies
performed in an unaccredited facility, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) A healthcare insurer shall not pay for mammographies performed
in an unaccredited facility after January 1, 1990.
(2) This section applies to a credentialed or accredited place
of service in which the service is provided.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-79-140(e), concerning copayments and
deductibles under a health benefit plan for examinations for breast cancer,
is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) Benefits under this section are subject to any health benefit
plan provisions that apply to other services covered by the health benefit
plan, except that a health benefit plan shall not impose a copayment or
deductible cost-sharing requirement for a screening mammogram, even if:
*ANS072*
01/29/2025 9:45:56 AM ANS072

HB1309
(A) A service is provided on different dates of service;
or
(B) More than one (1) service is provided on the same date
of service.
(2) A breast ultrasound shall not be subject to a deductible or
any applicable copayment cost-sharing requirement, even if:
(A) A service is provided on different dates of service;
or
(B) More than one (1) service is provided on the same date
of service.
(3) A healthcare insurer shall ensure that an individual's cost-
sharing requirement under a health benefit plan that is applicable to a
diagnostic examination for breast cancer, including breast magnetic resonance
imaging, is no less favorable than the cost-sharing requirement that is
applicable to a screening examination for breast cancer.





















01/29/2025 9:45:56 AM ANS072